Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6959XC (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1089, section 3, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 SEC. 3. FUTURE REPEAL. This Act is repealed December 31, 3 2026 upon the conclusion of the bankruptcy proceeding described 4 in section 2 of this Act, including all appeals thereto . 5